Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 489-1 to 489-8 designated as Part I by L 2000, c
227, §3.

[§489-1] Purpose; construction. (a)
The purpose of this chapter is to protect the interests, rights, and privileges
of all persons within the State with regard to access and use of public
accommodations by prohibiting unfair discrimination.

(b) This chapter shall be liberally construed
to further the purposes stated in subsection (a). [L 1986, c 292, pt of §1]

Cross References

Civil rights commission, see chapter 368.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next